Utah statutes.
61-6-9.   Notice of special or annual meetings to consider voting rights.

(1)  If a special meeting is requested, notice of the special meeting of shareholders shall be given as promptly as reasonably practicable by the issuing public corporation to all shareholders of record as of the record date set for the meeting, whether or not they are entitled to vote at the meeting.

(2)  Notice of the special or annual shareholder meeting at which the voting rights are to be considered must include or be accompanied by the following:

(a)  a copy of the acquiring person statement delivered to the issuing public corporation; and

(b)  a statement by the board of directors of the corporation, authorized by its directors, of its position or recommendation, or that it is taking no position or making no recommendation, with respect to the proposed control share acquisition.

